fi: Hammastahnan maku: Purukumi; Kirsikka; Minttu; Maustamaton; Muu
th: รสชาติยาสีฟัน: บับเบิ้ลกัม; เชอร์รี; มินต์; ไม่ปรุงแต่ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Smaak tandpasta: Bubblegum; Kers; Munt; Smaakloos; Andere
ja: 歯科用軟膏の味: バブルガム; チェリー; ミント; ノンフレーバー; その他
sv: Tandkrämssmak: Tuggummi; Körsbär; Mynta; Ej smaksatt; Övrigt
da: Tandpastasmag: Tyggegummi; Kirsebær; Mint; Uden smag; Andet
bg-BG: Вкус на денталната паста: Дъвка за балончета; Череша; Мента; Неовкусена; Други
vi: Hương kem đánh răng: Kẹo cao su; Anh đào; Bạc hà; Không có hương vị; Khác
it: Aroma della pasta dentale: Gomma da masticare; Ciliegio; Menta; Non aromatizzato; Altro
zh-CN: 牙膏香精: 泡泡糖; 樱桃; 薄荷; 无味; 其他
de: Zahnpasta-Geschmack: Kaugummi; Kirsche; Minze; Geschmacksneutral; Sonstiges
ko: 치약 맛: 풍선껌; 체리; 민트; 무향; 기타
lt-LT: Dantų pastos skonis: Kramtomoji guma; Vyšnios; Mėtos; Nepagardintas; Kita
en: Dental paste flavor: Bubblegum; Cherry; Mint; Unflavored; Other
pl: Smak pasty dentystycznej: Guma balonowa; Wiśnia; Mięta; Niearomatyzowany; Inne
tr: Diş macunu aroması: Sakız; Kiraz; Nane; Aromasız; Diğer
cs: Příchuť zubní pasty: Žvýkačka; Třešeň; Máta; Neochucené; Jiné
pt-BR: Sabor da pasta dental: Chiclete; Cereja; Hortelã; Sem sabor; Outro
es: Sabor de pasta dental: Goma de mascar; Cereza; Menta; Sin sabor; Otros
sl-SI: Okus zobne paste: Žvečilni gumi; Češnja; Meta; Brez okusa; Drugo
fr: Goût de dentifrice: Chewing-gum; Cerise; Menthe; Sans saveur; Autre
ru: Вкус зубной пасты: Жевательная резинка; Вишня; Мята; Без ароматизаторов; Другой
nb: Tannpastasmak: Tyggegummi; Kirsebær; Mynte; Ikke smaksatt; Annet
sk-SK: Príchuť zubnej pasty: Žuvačka; Čerešňa; Mäta; Neochutený; Iné
el: Γεύση οδοντιατρικής πάστας: Τσίχλα; Κεράσι; Μέντα; Χωρίς γεύση; Άλλο
ro-RO: Aromă pastă de dinți: Gumă de mestecat; Cireșe; Mentă; Fără aromă; Altele
hu: Fogpaszta ízesítése: Rágógumi; Cseresznye; Menta; Ízesítés nélküli; Egyéb
pt-PT: Sabor de pasta dentífrica: Pastilha elástica; Cereja; Menta; Sem sabor; Outro
hr-HR: Okus zubne paste: Žvakaća guma; Trešnja; Metvica; Bez okusa; Ostalo
zh-TW: 牙膏口味: 泡泡糖; 櫻桃; 薄荷; 無味; 其他